Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§414-1 Short title. This chapter shall
be known and may be cited as the "Hawaii Business Corporation Act".
[L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §3]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next